Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1503.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Subject to the requirements of article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, section 38-1171, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-1171. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "First responder": (a) Has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-1204. (b) Includes all of the following: (i) A member of the Arizona national guard who is on state active duty in this state and a correctional officer who is employed by the state department of corrections. (ii) A pilot who is employed by a law ENFORCEMENT agency. 2. "Killed in the line of duty" means killed as the result of another person's criminal act while in the performance of the first responder's official duties. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Retroactivity This act applies retroactively to from and after December 31, 2025. Sec. 3. Requirements for enactment; three-fourths vote Pursuant to article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, section 38-1171, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature. Sec. 4. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 15, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 15, 2026.